Arkansas, session 2025, SB438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 17, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-17-125. Recruitment — Prohibitions — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Athletics personnel" means athletic directors and other
individuals actively involved in organizing, training, or coaching athletic
events for student athletes;
(2) "Recruit" means the use of undue influence or special
inducement by a coach or an athletics personnel member employed by a school
that is a member of the Arkansas Activities Association in an attempt to
encourage, induce, pressure, urge, or entice a prospective student of any age
to transfer to the school or retain a student at the school for the purpose
of participating in extracurricular activities; and
(3) "School" means a public school district or an open-
enrollment public charter school.
*TNL312*
03/12/2025 7:43:30 AM TNL312

SB438
(b) A coach or an athletics personnel member who is employed by a
school and is found by the Arkansas Activities Association to have recruited
a student to the school at which he or she is employed shall be permanently
banned from employment as a coach or an athletics personnel member at a
school in this state.































03/12/2025 7:43:30 AM TNL312